Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4055.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of veterans' services; grants; mental health; tribal nations A. The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of veterans' services for grants to veterans with post-traumatic stress disorder in this state who need a mental health counselor. B. Of the amount appropriated in subsection A of this section, the department of veterans' services shall distribute $3,000,000 to federally recognized tribal nations within this state for veterans with post-traumatic stress disorder who need a mental health counselor.